Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-125
Act, how cited.

Sections 52-125 to 52-159 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Construction Lien Act.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 1.

Trustees of a health, welfare, and pension fund may assert a construction lien on behalf of union employees against the property owner. Omaha Constr. Indus. Pension Plan v. Children's Hosp., 11 Neb. App. 35, 642 N.W.2d 849 (2002).